Ohio, session 136, HB517.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That section 727.011 of the Revised Code be 3
amended to read as follows: 4
Sec. 727.011. (A) For purposes of this section, "nonprofit 5
land conservation organization" means a nonprofit organization 6
described in section 170(c)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code that 7
is dedicated to land conservation purposes. 8
(B) For the purpose of controlling the blight and disease 9
of shade trees within public rights-of-way, and for planting, 10
maintaining, trimming, and removing shade trees in and along the 11
streets of a municipality, the legislative authority of such 12
municipal corporation may establish one or more districts in the 13
municipality designating the boundaries thereof, and may each 14
year thereafter, by ordinance, designate the district in which 15
such control, planting, care, and maintenance shall be effected. 16
The ordinance shall set forth an estimate of the cost and 17
providing for the levy of a special assessment upon all the real 18
property in the district, in the amount and in the manner 19
provided in section 727.01 of the Revised Code, for planting, 20

H. B. No. 517 Page 2
As Introduced
maintaining, trimming, and removing shade trees. However, the 21
ordinance may provide for an exemption from special assessments 22
that applies to entities that are determined by the internal 23
revenue service to be tax-exempt pursuant to section 501(c)(3) 24
of the Internal Revenue Codenonprofit land conservation 25
organizations. The ordinance shall be adopted as other 26
ordinances and a succinct summary of the ordinance shall be 27
published in the manner provided in section 731.21 of the 28
Revised Code. Bonds and anticipatory notes may be issued in 29
anticipation of the collection of such special assessments, 30
under section 133.17 of the Revised Code. 31
Section 2. That existing section 727.011 of the Revised 32
Code is hereby repealed. 33